src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-juallge_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Noun - juällge: # N_EVEN (CGrad, umlaut, VH)
    juällge+N+Sg+Nom: juällge
    juällge+N+Sg+Gen: juolge
    juällge+N+Sg+Acc: juolgev
    juällge+N+Sg+Ill: juallgáj
    juällge+N+Sg+Ine: juolgen
    juällge+N+Sg+Ela: [juolgest, juolges]
    juällge+N+Sg+Com: [julgijn, julgijna]
    juällge+N+Pl+Nom: juolge
    juällge+N+Pl+Gen: julgij
    juällge+N+Pl+Acc: julgijt
    juällge+N+Pl+Ill: julgijda
    juällge+N+Pl+Ine: julgijn
    juällge+N+Pl+Ela: [julgijst, julgijs]
    juällge+N+Pl+Com: [julgij, julgijgum]
    juällge+N+Ess: juällgen
    juällge+N+Abe: juolgedak
